ro_RO.aff
SFX Q Y 152
SFX Q   0     u      [^eu]
SFX Q   0     ul      [^eu]            adj. m. sg. art.
SFX Q   0     ului    [^eu]            adj. m. sg. dat.
SFX Q   0     i       [^cdenstux]      adj. m. pl.
SFX Q   0     ii      [^cdenstux]      adj. m. pl. art.
SFX Q   0     ilor    [^cdenstux]      adj. m. pl. dat.
SFX Q   0     ă       [^cegrsuiț]        adj. f. sg.
SFX Q   0     e      i        adj. f. sg.
SFX Q   ț     ață      [^u]ț        adj. f. sg.
SFX Q   0     ă      uț        adj. f. sg.
SFX Q   0     a       [^cgrsuț]         adj. f. sg. art.
SFX Q   ț     ața      [^u]ț         adj. f. sg. art.
SFX Q   0     a       uț         adj. f. sg. art.
SFX Q   0     ei      [^cgnrsu]        adj. f. sg. dat.
SFX Q   0     e       [^cgnrsu]        adj. f. pl.
SFX Q   0     ele     [^cgnrsu]        adj. f. pl. art.
SFX Q   0     elor    [^cgnrsu]        adj. f. pl. dat.
SFX Q   0     i       [^s]c            adj. m. pl.
SFX Q   0     ii      [^s]c            adj. m. pl. art.
SFX Q   0     ilor    [^s]c            adj. m. pl. dat.
SFX Q   0     ă       [^s]c            adj. f. sg.
SFX Q   0     a       [^s]c            adj. f. sg. art.
SFX Q   0     e      [^s]c            
SFX Q   0     ele       [^s]c           
SFX Q   0     elor      [^s]c            
SFX Q   sc    ști     sc               adj. m. pl.
SFX Q   sc    știi    sc               adj. m. pl. art.
SFX Q   sc    știlor  sc               adj. m. pl. dat.
SFX Q   sc    ască    [^a]..sc         adj. f. sg.
SFX Q   sc    asca    [^a]..sc         adj. f. sg. art.
SFX Q   x     cși     x        # de verificat ordinea și la rândurile următoare
SFX Q   x     cșii    x
SFX Q   x     cșilor  x
SFX Q   0     ă       a..sc
SFX Q   0     a       a..sc
SFX Q   e     i       e
SFX Q   e     ii      e
SFX Q   e     ilor    e
SFX Q   g     ă       [^eu]g
SFX Q   g     a       [^eu]g
SFX Q   g     gă     ug
SFX Q   g     ga     ug
SFX Q   g     ge     ug
SFX Q   g     gele     ug
SFX Q   g     gelor     ug
SFX Q   g     agă     eg
SFX Q   g     aga     eg
SFX Q   0     ile     g
SFX Q   0     i       [^a]n
SFX Q   0     ii      [^a]n
SFX Q   0     ilor    [^a]n
SFX Q   0     ei      [^a]n
SFX Q   0     e       [^a]n
SFX Q   0     ele     [^a]n
SFX Q   0     elor    [^a]n
SFX Q   an    eni     [^eflmt]an
SFX Q   an    enii    [^eflmt]an
SFX Q   an    enilor  [^eflmt]an
SFX Q   an    enei    [^eflmt]an
SFX Q   an    ene     [^eflmt]an
SFX Q   an    enele   [^eflmt]an
SFX Q   an    enelor  [^eflmt]an
SFX Q   an    ni      [^c]ean
SFX Q   an    nii     [^c]ean
SFX Q   an    nilor   [^c]ean
SFX Q   an    nei     [^c]ean
SFX Q   an    ne      [^c]ean
SFX Q   an    nele    [^c]ean
SFX Q   an    nelor   [^c]ean
SFX Q   an    eni     cean
SFX Q   an    enii    cean
SFX Q   an    enilor  cean
SFX Q   an    enei    cean
SFX Q   an    ene     cean
SFX Q   an    enele   cean
SFX Q   an    enelor  cean
SFX Q   0     i       [flmt]an
SFX Q   0     ii      [flmt]an
SFX Q   0     ilor    [flmt]an
SFX Q   0     ei      [flmt]an
SFX Q   0     e       [flmt]an
SFX Q   0     ele     [flmt]an
SFX Q   0     elor    [flmt]an
SFX Q   0     ă       [^o][rs]
SFX Q   0     a       [^o][rs]
SFX Q   0     ei      [^o][rs]
SFX Q   0     e       [^o][rs]
SFX Q   0     ele     [^o][rs]
SFX Q   0     elor    [^o][rs]
SFX Q   r     are     [^j]or      # ????? feminin singular!!!
SFX Q   r     area    tor
SFX Q   r     ara     [^jt]or
SFX Q   r     ară     [^jt]or
SFX Q   r     arei    [^j]or
SFX Q   r     are     [^j]or
SFX Q   r     arele   [^j]or
SFX Q   r     arelor  [^j]or
SFX Q   0     ă       jor
SFX Q   r     ra      jor
SFX Q   r     rei     jor
SFX Q   r     re      jor
SFX Q   r     rele    jor
SFX Q   r     relor   jor
SFX Q   s     asă     [eo]s
SFX Q   s     asa     [eo]s
SFX Q   s     asei    os
SFX Q   s     ase     os
SFX Q   s     asele   os
SFX Q   s     aselor  os
SFX Q   0     l       u
SFX Q   0     lui     u
SFX Q   u     i       [^r]u
SFX Q   u     ii      iu
SFX Q   u     ii      [^ri]u
SFX Q   u     ilor    [^r]u
SFX Q   u     i       [^s].ru
SFX Q   u     ii      [^s].ru
SFX Q   u     ilor    [^s].ru
SFX Q   stru  ștri    stru
SFX Q   stru  ștrii   stru
SFX Q   stru  ștrilor stru
SFX Q   u     ă       [^ei]u
SFX Q   u     a       u
SFX Q   u     ei      [^e]u
SFX Q   u     e       [^ei]u
SFX Q   u     ele     [^ei]u
SFX Q   u     elor    [^ei]u
SFX Q   u     aua     eu
SFX Q   u     lei     eu
SFX Q   u     le      eu
SFX Q   u     lele    eu
SFX Q   u     lelor   eu
SFX Q   u     e       iu
SFX Q   u     i       iu
SFX Q   u     ile     iu
SFX Q   u     ilor    iu
SFX Q   d     zi      d
SFX Q   d     zii     d
SFX Q   d     zilor   d
SFX Q   s     și      s
SFX Q   s     șii     s
SFX Q   s     șilor   s
SFX Q   t     ți      [^s]t
SFX Q   t     ții     [^s]t
SFX Q   t     ților   [^s]t
SFX Q   st    ști     st
SFX Q   st    știi    st
SFX Q   st    știlor  st
SFX Q   0     ei      [aei]c
SFX Q   0     e       [aei]c
SFX Q   0     ele     [aei]c
SFX Q   0     elor    [aei]c
PFX Q Y 1
PFX Q 0 ne .
#end*******************************************************************************
