ro_RO.dic
abonat/Q
absorbant/Q
acaloric/Q
accesorist/Q
aciolat/Q
acricios/Q
acumetric/Q
adaptat/Q
administrabil/Q
adresat/Q
aerifer/Q
aferat/Q
afumător/Q
agramat/Q
ajurat/Q
albăstrui/Q
alfablocant/Q
almicantarat/Q
aluminosilicat/Q
ambasador/Q
americănit/Q
amoniat/Q
anabolic/Q
anastaltic/Q
anemiat/Q
angrosist/Q
antecalculat/Q
anticancer/Q
antidiabetic/Q
antiliric/Q
antipiretic/Q
antiseptic/Q
antofit/Q
apartidic/Q
apod/Q
apretor/Q
apțian/Q
arendășit/Q
arhanghelit/Q
aristotelician/Q
arsenifer/Q
arădan/Q
asemuit/Q
asimptotic/Q
astmatiform/Q
atenționat/Q
atribuibil/Q
auros/Q
autocrator/Q
autoironizat/Q
autosugestionat/Q
avizat/Q
așanumit/Q
badijonat/Q
bandurist/Q
bastonat/Q
bejenit/Q
berriasian/Q
bicios/Q
bilobat/Q
bioeconomic/Q
birocrat/Q
blagian/Q
bobleț/Q
bolândatic/Q
bosumflat/Q
brevetat/Q
bruftuluit/Q
buchisit/Q
buimatic/Q
burghezesc/Q
buznit/Q
bădăran/Q
bălălăit/Q
bătrânicios/Q
cadrimotor/Q
calculabil/Q
calos/Q
cancerizat/Q
capacitiv/Q
caragialesc/Q
cariat/Q
cartezian/Q
catalogat/Q
causticizat/Q
celebrant/Q
centroid/Q
ceremonios/Q
chefnit/Q
chiftit/Q
chitcăit/Q
ciclonal/Q
cinematografiat/Q
ciorovăit/Q
cititor/Q
civit/Q
clențenit/Q
clonic/Q
clănțănit/Q
cochilier/Q
coeziv/Q
colectivist/Q
columnar/Q
comensurabil/Q
compartimentat/Q
comportat/Q
comunard/Q
concesionat/Q
condensor/Q
confiscabil/Q
conjugat/Q
constantinat/Q
consumator/Q
contingentar/Q
contraservit/Q
conversat/Q
cooperativizat/Q
coralifer/Q
corespondat/Q
corotit/Q
costător/Q
credincios/Q
criant/Q
crispant/Q
cromwellian/Q
crăpăcios/Q
cufundat/Q
culturist/Q
cuprinzător/Q
customizabil/Q
cvadrifoliat/Q
câinit/Q
cârtit/Q
călăuzitor/Q
căsnicesc/Q
dalmațian/Q
debifat/Q
decarburat/Q
declasat/Q
decorat/Q
defavorizant/Q
deformabil/Q
dehulat/Q
delitescent/Q
demobilizat/Q
denazificat/Q
depanator/Q
deportat/Q
deratizat/Q
descentralizat/Q
descreierat/Q
descărcător/Q
deshidratat/Q
despădurit/Q
desărcinat/Q
detrimental/Q
dezaburitor/Q
dezbinat/Q
dezintegrat/Q
dezorganizat/Q
deținător/Q
diamantin/Q
difamator/Q
dilatator/Q
diplocefal/Q
discursiv/Q
dispensional/Q
distribuitor/Q
divorțat/Q
doftoricit/Q
domolit/Q
dovedit/Q
dresat/Q
duelat/Q
dureros/Q
dărâmător/Q
echitabil/Q
ecru/Q
edulcorat/Q
eidetic/Q
electrogalvanic/Q
elevator/Q
emarginat/Q
enantic/Q
energointensiv/Q
eolitic/Q
epinatant/Q
eristic/Q
escepțional/Q
estorcat/Q
etnicist/Q
euristic/Q
eventiv/Q
excavat/Q
executor/Q
expandabil/Q
explodat/Q
extenuat/Q
extranațional/Q
eșantionat/Q
falimentat/Q
faringian/Q
fațetat/Q
fenician/Q
fermenticid/Q
fibrocartilaginos/Q
fildeșiu/Q
financiar-fiscal/Q
fitocid/Q
flambat/Q
floribund/Q
fob/Q
fondator/Q
formulat/Q
fotomecanic/Q
frazat/Q
frontologic/Q
fugos/Q
funduar/Q
fuzionist/Q
fărâmat/Q
galvanizat/Q
gastroscopic/Q
genealogist/Q
geofizic/Q
gesticulat/Q
gibos/Q
glagolitic/Q
glotalizat/Q
gonflat/Q
granivor/Q
grefabil/Q
grohăitor/Q
guițat/Q
gâcit/Q
gălbenatic/Q
halofit/Q
hastiform/Q
hemimetabol/Q
hexapod/Q
hidrofit/Q
hindustan/Q
hipofosforos/Q
hojbăit/Q
hoplit/Q
huhurat/Q
hușean/Q
hălpăit/Q
icastic/Q
ieftinit/Q
ihtiofobic/Q
imaterialist/Q
imparidigitat/Q
implict/Q
impronunțabil/Q
inacuzabil/Q
incapacitant/Q
inconfundabil/Q
indeclinabil/Q
indisciplinabil/Q
inegalabil/Q
infecțios/Q
infraroșu/Q
injectat/Q
insensibilizator/Q
instaurator/Q
integrist/Q
intercomunal/Q
internaționalist/Q
interuptibil/Q
intramontan/Q
inundabil/Q
investigator/Q
ipotecat/Q
ireproșabil/Q
ispovedit/Q
iterativ/Q
izolabil/Q
jelit/Q
jonctor/Q
jupuit/Q
kievean/Q
lacunar/Q
lapon/Q
leat/Q
lehămetit/Q
levigat/Q
libidinos/Q
liliputan/Q
lingușit/Q
literarartistic/Q
locvace/Q
lucid/Q
lungăreț/Q
lăcomit/Q
lăudăros/Q
macru/Q
mahoni/Q
malțat/Q
manierizat/Q
margaric/Q
marșat/Q
maternal/Q
mazilit/Q
medico-militar/Q
melafic/Q
menajat/Q
merinos/Q
metalescent/Q
metilenic/Q
micotic/Q
mieros/Q
milogit/Q
minimalizator/Q
miruitor/Q
mituitor/Q
mocnit/Q
modulator/Q
momitor/Q
monocrat/Q
mononuclear/Q
montat/Q
morocănit/Q
mototol/Q
mucegăios/Q
multiflor/Q
mundan/Q
muscicol/Q
muzicalizat/Q
mângâiat/Q
măgulit/Q
mărunțel/Q
napolitan/Q
navetist/Q
neacordat/Q
neascultător/Q
necesitat/Q
neconvingător/Q
nedecolorat/Q
nedreptățit/Q
nefropat/Q
negrofil/Q
neirigat/Q
nemulțumit/Q
neocriticist/Q
neomogen/Q
nepoftit/Q
nerecoltat/Q
nesecătuit/Q
netemperat/Q
nevalorificat/Q
neîndemânatic/Q
nidicol/Q
nitrurat/Q
non-comunitar/Q
normator/Q
nucleofil/Q
nuvelist/Q
năzatic/Q
obstruat/Q
ofensat/Q
omenit/Q
oploșit/Q
orgiastic/Q
osculator/Q
oxifob/Q
palustru/Q
papulos/Q
parcurs/Q
pasivizat/Q
pedantit/Q
penetrat/Q
perifrazat/Q
perturbativ/Q
pielos/Q
piric/Q
plagiator/Q
pliat/Q
plâns/Q
poliacant/Q
polizat/Q
porcăit/Q
posttonic/Q
prealocat/Q
predicativ/Q
premers/Q
pretendent/Q
pricipal/Q
privelegiat/Q
profeminist/Q
pronominal/Q
protagonist/Q
prădat/Q
psihoterapeutic/Q
pupăit/Q
pârjolit/Q
părintesc/Q
radicalizat/Q
rapsodiat/Q
reaclimatizat/Q
reafurisit/Q
realunecat/Q
reanimalizat/Q
rearmat/Q
reaugmentat/Q
reaxiomatizat/Q
reblindat/Q
rebrăzduit/Q
rebăjenit/Q
recanotat/Q
receptiv/Q
recihăit/Q
reclironomisit/Q
recolectivizat/Q
recongestionat/Q
recopertat/Q
recurbat/Q
recătănit/Q
redecorat/Q
redenazalizat/Q
redesalinizat/Q
redesfundat/Q
rediscuit/Q
redrapat/Q
redătător/Q
reerbicidat/Q
reexhibat/Q
refederalizat/Q
refleșcăit/Q
refrizat/Q
regalvanizat/Q
reglosat/Q
regurăit/Q
rehohotit/Q
rehălălăit/Q
reimpresionat/Q
reinstilat/Q
reiobăgit/Q
rejucat/Q
relepăit/Q
relucrat/Q
remanșonat/Q
remeritat/Q
remitridatizat/Q
remoșcondit/Q
remândrit/Q
reneguțătorit/Q
renăruit/Q
reofilit/Q
reostenit/Q
repartajat/Q
repertractat/Q
replacat/Q
repoftorit/Q
repracticat/Q
repreumblat/Q
reproductibil/Q
reprăjit/Q
repăcănit/Q
reratat/Q
rerechiziționat/Q
rerefrișat/Q
rereordonanțat/Q
rereutilat/Q
reridat/Q
rerăgilat/Q
rerășpăluit/Q
resedat/Q
restaționat/Q
retapițat/Q
reticulat/Q
retransvazat/Q
retrântit/Q
reuleiat/Q
revalorizat/Q
revivisecționat/Q
revăcărit/Q
rezecabil/Q
rezumzăit/Q
reîmbodolit/Q
reîmprejmuit/Q
reîncetat/Q
reîncuviințat/Q
reînduplecat/Q
reîngroșat/Q
reînnărăvit/Q
reîntorlocat/Q
reînvrăjbit/Q
reșerfuit/Q
reșumenit/Q
rinologic/Q
românofrancez/Q
ruginit/Q
râncezit/Q
răscolitor/Q
răzbătător/Q
salinizat/Q
sastisit/Q
scelerat/Q
scontat/Q
scurtuț/Q
secundar/Q
semiautomat/Q
semisolid/Q
sericigen/Q
sfânt/Q
silicicol/Q
simultaneist/Q
sisific/Q
smârcâit/Q
solvabil/Q
spectacologic/Q
spirtos/Q
spătos/Q
stereocartograf/Q
stolonifer/Q
străduitor/Q
subaltern/Q
subpopulat/Q
sudoripar/Q
superangular/Q
supralicitator/Q
surmenat/Q
sălăjean/Q
talpiform/Q
tebecist/Q
temporalizat/Q
termoprotector/Q
tineresc/Q
topit/Q
transeuropean/Q
trapeziform/Q
triclorurat/Q
tropotat/Q
turan/Q
târnosit/Q
tăzlăuan/Q
umanoid/Q
uninațional/Q
uruit/Q
validabil/Q
venerat/Q
vexat/Q
vinețiu/Q
vizibil/Q
vorbar/Q
vânturatic/Q
vătășesc/Q
zborșit/Q
zgribulit/Q
zoolatru/Q
zăhărit/Q
îmbrăcat/Q
împoncișat/Q
împătrit/Q
încolăcit/Q
încălat/Q
înduioșat/Q
înfășurat/Q
înjugat/Q
înrourat/Q
întocmit/Q
învelit/Q
înzestrat/Q
șanjabil/Q
șlefuitor/Q
științificofantastic/Q
țigănos/Q
aromânesc/Q
